Utah statutes.
26-3-6.   Uniform standards -- Powers of department.
The department may:
(1)  participate and cooperate with state, local, and federal agencies and
other organizations in the design and implementation of uniform standards for
the management of health information  at the federal, state, and local levels;
and
(2)  undertake and support research, development, demonstrations, and
evaluations that support uniform health information standards.
